Idaho, session 2025, S1083.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 42-111, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-111. DOMESTIC PURPOSES DEFINED. (1) For purposes of sections
42-221, 42-227, 42-230, 42-235, 42-237a, 42-242, 42-243, and 42-1401A,
Idaho Code, the :
(a) The phrase "domestic purposes" or "domestic uses" means:
(a) (i) The use of water for homes, organization camps, public
campgrounds, livestock, and for any other purpose in connection
therewith, including irrigation of up to one-half (1/2) acre of
land, if the total use is not in excess of does not exceed thirteen
thousand (13,000) gallons per day,; or
(b) (ii) Any other uses, The use of water for any other purpose,
if the total use does not exceed a diversion rate of four one-hun-
dredths (0.04) cubic feet per second and a diversion volume of
twenty-five hundred (2,500) gallons per day volume of two and
eight-tenths (2.8) acre feet per year.
(2) For purposes of the sections listed in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion, domestic purposes or domestic uses shall not include water for multi-
ple ownership subdivisions, mobile home parks, or commercial or business es-


tablishments, unless the use meets the diversion rate and volume limitations
set forth in subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(b) "Domestic purposes" or "domestic uses" shall not include water for
the following purposes, unless the use meets the diversion rate and vol-
ume limitations set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(i) Mobile home parks or recreational vehicle parks;
(ii) Apartments, condominiums, and similar developments with
multiple dwelling units;
(iii) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, subdi-
visions, as defined in chapter 13, title 50, Idaho Code; or
(iv) Commercial or business establishments or mixed-use estab-
lishments where the water is used primarily for commercial or
business purposes.
(3) (2) Multiple Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,
multiple water rights for domestic uses or domestic purposes, as defined in
this section, shall not be established or exercised in a manner to satisfy
a single combined water use or purpose that would not itself come within the
definition of a domestic use or purpose under this section. The purpose of
this limitation is to prohibit the diversion and use of water, under a combi-
nation of domestic purposes or domestic uses as defined in this section, to
provide a supply of water for a use that does not meet the exemption of sec-
tion 42-227, Idaho Code, and is required to comply with the mandatory appli-
cation and permit process for developing a right to the use of water pursuant
to chapter 2, title 42, Idaho Code.
(3) Multiple water rights for domestic purposes or uses may be estab-
lished and exercised from the same point or points of diversion if the use
is limited to residential, in-home use. This subsection does not affect any
other permitting requirement or other requirement that may apply to the use
of water within a subdivision. For the purposes of this section, the term
"in-home use" means the utilization of water within a residence or house-
hold, including all activities that require water, such as drinking, cook-
ing, bathing, and cleaning within and around the household. It does not in-
clude irrigation of lawns, gardens, landscaping, pastures, or other open
spaces.
SECTION 2. That Section 42-227, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-227. DRILLING AND USE OF WELLS FOR DOMESTIC PURPOSES EXCEPTED. (1)
The Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, excavation and
opening of wells and the withdrawal of water therefrom for domestic purposes
or uses as defined in section 42-111, Idaho Code, shall not be subject to the
permit requirements under section 42-229, Idaho Code; providing such wells
and withdrawal devices are subject to inspection by the department of water
resources and the department of environmental quality and providing further
that the drilling of such wells shall be subject to the licensing provisions
of section 42-238, Idaho Code. Rights to ground water for such domestic pur-
poses may be acquired by withdrawal and use.
(2) Wells and withdrawal devices for domestic purposes or uses shall be
subject to inspection by the department of water resources and the depart-
ment of environmental quality.


(3) Well drillers shall be licensed pursuant to the licensing provi-
sions of section 42-238, Idaho Code.
(4) For purposes of new diversions within subdivisions, as defined in
chapter 13, title 50, Idaho Code, in any area where the director of the de-
partment of water resources has issued a moratorium order on the develop-
ment of new water rights or has designated a critical ground water area or
ground water management area, an application for permit, pursuant to section
42-229, Idaho Code, shall be required for the diversion of water for any new
domestic purposes or uses, as defined in section 42-111, Idaho Code, other
than for in-home uses, as defined in section 42-111, Idaho Code, or watering
livestock.
SECTION 3. That Section 42-351, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-351. ILLEGAL DIVERSION OR USE OF WATER -- ENFORCEMENT PROCEDURE --
INJUNCTIVE RELIEF. (1) It is unlawful for any person to divert or use water
from:
(a) From a natural watercourse or from a ground water source without
having obtained a valid water right to do so, or to divert or use water
not;
(b) Not in conformance with a valid water right.; or
(2) (c) It is unlawful for any person to divert or use water in In sub-
stantial violation of any provision of this title, or any rule, permit,
condition of approval, or order issued or promulgated pursuant to this
title that is related to the diversion or use of water.
(3) (2) Upon investigation of available information, the director of
the department of water resources shall have the discretion to issue:
(a) Issue a written notice of violation to the person in accordance with
the provisions of section 42-1701B, Idaho Code, for the illegal diver-
sion or use of water.; or
(b) Proceed with enforcement actions pursuant to section 42-1701C,
Idaho Code, in cases of diversions for domestic purposes or uses as de-
fined in section 42-111, Idaho Code; and
(4) (3) Notwithstanding the issuance of a notice of violation the pro-
visions of subsection (2) of this section, the director may also file an ac-
tion seeking injunctive relief directing the person to cease and desist the
activity or activities alleged to be in violation of applicable law or any
existing water right.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 17, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1701C, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1701C. ENFORCEMENT OF DOMESTIC PURPOSE AND DOMESTIC USE LIMITA-
TIONS. (1) If the director of the department of water resources becomes aware
of water use that exceeds the authorized limits of an appurtenant water right
for domestic purposes or uses as defined in section 42-111, Idaho Code, re-
gardless of when the use was established, the director may:
(a) Notify the property owner, in writing, of the alleged excess use;
and


(b) Provide the property owner ninety (90) days to remedy the excess
use or provide information that the water use does not exceed authorized
limits of the appurtenant water right for domestic purposes or uses.
(2) If, after notification by the director pursuant to subsection (1)
of this section, the property owner fails to remedy the excess use or to pro-
vide information that the use does not exceed authorized limits within the
time prescribed and to the director's satisfaction, then the director shall
issue a notice of violation to the property owner, identifying the informa-
tion supporting the determination of excess use.
(3)(a) Any person to whom a notice of violation has been issued pursuant
to subsection (2) of this section shall be liable for a civil penalty
pursuant to this section.
(i) For excess irrigation, a penalty of five hundred dollars
($500) for every one-tenth (0.1) of an acre in excess irrigation
above the authorized limits shall be assessed.
(ii) For excess use other than irrigation, the lesser of the fol-
lowing shall be assessed:
1. One hundred dollars ($100) for every day water is di-
verted at a rate that exceeds the maximum authorized diver-
sion rate; or
2. One hundred dollars ($100) for every acre-foot diverted
in excess of the maximum authorized annual diversion volume.
(b) Penalties shall be renewed each year until the excess use has been
remedied to the director's satisfaction but shall not exceed five thou-
sand dollars ($5,000) in any given year.
(4) The director may request that the county in which the property is
located collect the penalty for excess use. If the county agrees to collect
the penalty:
(a) The director shall provide the county with a copy of the notice of
violation issued pursuant to this section; and
(b) The county shall retain half of the penalty proceeds and deliver the
other half to the director.
(5) Unpaid penalties shall be filed as a lien against the property until
paid in full.
(6) Once a penalty has been assessed for a particular irrigation sea-
son, as provided in this section, it shall be due and payable even if the ex-
cess use is subsequently resolved.
SECTION 5. That Section 42-1805, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-1805. ADDITIONAL DUTIES. In addition to other duties prescribed by
law, the director of the department of water resources shall have the follow-
ing powers and duties:
(1) To represent the state in all matters pertaining to interstate and
international water rights affecting Idaho water resources; and to cooper-
ate with all agencies, now existing or hereafter to be formed, within the
state or within other jurisdictions, in matters affecting the development of
the water resources of this state.
(2) To prepare a present and continuing inventory of the water re-
sources of this state, ascertain means and methods of conserving and


augmenting these and determine as accurately as possible the most effective
means by which these water resources may be applied for the benefit of the
people of this state.
(3) To conduct surveys, tests, investigations, research, examina-
tions, studies, and estimates of cost relating to availability of unappro-
priated water, effective use of existing supply, conservation, storage,
distribution and use of water.
(4) To prepare and compile information and data obtained and to make the
same available to interested individuals or agencies.
(5) To cooperate with and coordinate activities with the director of
the department of environmental quality as such activities relate to the
functions of either or both departments concerning water quality. Such co-
operation and coordination shall specifically require that:
(a) The director meet at least quarterly with the director of the de-
partment of environmental quality and his staff to discuss water qual-
ity programs. A copy of the minutes of such meeting shall be transmitted
to the governor.
(b) The director transmit to the director of the department of envi-
ronmental quality reports and information prepared by him pertaining to
water quality programs and proposed rules pertaining to water quality
programs.
(c) The director shall make available to the director of the department
of environmental quality and the director of the department of envi-
ronmental quality shall make available to the director all notices of
hearings relating to the promulgation of rules relating to water qual-
ity, waste discharge permits, and stream channel alteration, as such
directly affect water quality, and notices of any other hearings and
meetings which relate to water quality.
(6) To perform administrative duties and such other functions as the
board may, from time to time, assign to the director to enable the board to
carry out its powers and duties.
(7) After notice, to suspend the issuance or further action on permits
or applications, including permits or applications for domestic purposes or
uses as defined in section 42-111, Idaho Code, required pursuant to section
42-227, Idaho Code, as necessary to protect existing vested water rights or
to ensure compliance with the provisions of chapter 2, title 42, Idaho Code,
or to prevent violation of minimum flow provisions of the state water plan.
(8) To promulgate, adopt, modify, repeal and enforce rules implement-
ing or effectuating the powers and duties of the department.
(9) To seek a preliminary or permanent injunction, or both, or a tempo-
rary restraining order restraining any person from violating or attempting
to violate:
(a) Those provisions of law relating to all aspects of the appropria-
tion of water, distribution of water, headgates and measuring devices;
or
(b) The administrative or judicial orders entered in accordance with
the provisions of law.
(10) To develop, coordinate and provide, through contract or by other
means, for weather modification projects involving cloud seeding that are
designed to increase the water supplies of the state by enhancing natural


precipitation and that conform to state water planning objectives. To ac-
complish these purposes, the director is authorized to accept and use funds
acquired through legislative appropriation or by gift, grant, contribution
or funding received from any private or public individual or entity. All
funds accepted under this provision shall be transmitted to the state trea-
surer for deposit in the water administration account and shall be reserved
and made available until expended as ordered by the director for weather mod-
ification purposes determined by the director to be beneficial.
(11) To develop and implement a plan for data gathering to determine any
effect of the weather modification efforts in which the department is in-
volved.
(12) To receive, file, record, or retain documents of record on media
other than paper.
SECTION 6. That Section 31-3805, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 7. That Chapter 38, Title 31, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 31-3805, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
31-3805. DELIVERY OF WATER WITHIN SUBDIVISIONS. (1) The provisions of
this section shall apply to any proposed subdivision, as defined in chapter
13, title 50, Idaho Code, within the state of Idaho or to a subdivision sub-
ject to a more restrictive county or city zoning ordinance.
(2) For any subdivision that lies within the service area or area of
city impact of a municipal provider, the following requirements apply:
(a) If a shared well or public water system is installed, it shall be
designed to meet requirements of that municipal provider and be planned
to integrate with and connect to the municipal provider's system when
appropriate. The requirements of this paragraph shall not apply if an
agreement is reached with the municipal provider;
(b) The municipal provider shall be consulted in the design of the
shared well or public water system to ensure proper integration; and
(c) Upon connection to the municipal provider's system, the water
rights associated with the subdivision's shared well or public water
system shall be conveyed to the municipal provider.
(3) If surface water for irrigation is reasonably available to all or
any part of a subdivision, as provided in section 67-6537, Idaho Code, then
no subdivision plat, amendment to a subdivision plat, or any other plat or
map recognized by the city or county for the division of land will be ac-
cepted, approved, and recorded unless the owner or entity has provided for
the irrigation of lots within the subdivision using the available surface
water.
(4) For subdivisions using water provided by an irrigation entity, as
required by section 67-6537, Idaho Code, the subdivision plat or with the
plat mat as an exhibit shall include a description of the system used to de-
liver irrigation water from the irrigation entity's point of delivery to the
individual lots. In such cases:
(a) For proposed subdivisions within the incorporated limits of a city,
the irrigation system must be approved by the city zoning authority or


the city council, as provided by city ordinance, with the advice of the
irrigation entity charged with the delivery of water to such lands; and
(b) For proposed subdivisions located outside an incorporated city,
the irrigation system must be approved by the board of county commis-
sioners, with the advice of the irrigation entity charged with the
delivery of water to such lands.
(5) For subdivisions receiving water from an irrigation entity, the
subdivision plat or amendment to a subdivision plat shall contain notes
stating the following:
(a) That the subdivision or a portion of it is located within the ser-
vice area of the irrigation entity and the name and contact information
for the irrigation entity;
(b) That a system for the delivery of irrigation water to lots within
the subdivision has been provided;
(c) That the system has been approved as required by subsection (4) of
this section;
(d) That the purchaser of each lot shall remain subject to all assess-
ments levied by the irrigation entity; and
(e) That unpaid irrigation entity assessments are a lien on the land
within the irrigation entity.
SECTION 8. That Section 31-3806, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-3806. CIVIL ACTION TO ENFORCE. (1) If the owner of the property of
the person, firm, or corporation filing the subdivision plat, or amendment
to a subdivision plat, or any other plat or map recognized by the city or
county for the division of land fails to comply with either subsection (1) or
(2) of section 31-3805, Idaho Code, prior to sale of the lots in the subdivi-
sion to purchasers, the owner of the property, or the person, firm or corpo-
ration or entity filing the subdivision plat, or amendment to a subdivision
plat, or any other plat or map recognized by the city or county for the divi-
sion of land shall be liable to any purchaser for the costs of the lot's ex-
clusion plus all assessments due and owing or the actual cost of installation
of an irrigation delivery system not to exceed one thousand five hundred dol-
lars ($1,500) per lot all costs required to bring each subdivision lot into
compliance with section 31-3805. The purchaser shall have a right to enforce
this obligation in a civil action and the purchaser shall have the right to
elect exclusion or installation of the system in such action.
(2) Any person, firm or corporation who shall omit, neglect or refuse to
provide the purchaser or the irrigation entity within whose boundaries the
land is located, a copy of the disclosure statement required by subsection
(2) of section 31-3805, Idaho Code:
(a) Shall be liable to the purchaser as provided in subsection (1) of
this section.
(b) Shall be liable to the irrigation entity for its reasonable ex-
pense, including employee time, of locating the purchaser and providing
the information required in the form and for advising affected pur-
chasers of the lack of a water delivery system and for any assessments on
the property that are past due at the time of discovery of the violation.


The irrigation entity affected shall have a right to claim such expenses
in a civil action.
(3) (2) In any civil action filed under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, the prevailing party shall be awarded its reasonable costs and at-
torney's fees. The purchaser and irrigation entity shall have two (2) years
from the date of discovery of the violation to initiate any legal action.
SECTION 9. That Section 50-1334, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
50-1334. REVIEW OF WATER SYSTEMS ENCOMPASSED BY PLATS. Whenever any
plat is subject to the terms and requirements of sections 50-1326 through
50-1329, Idaho Code, no person shall offer for recording, or cause to be
recorded, a plat unless he or she shall have certified that he or she is in
compliance with section 31-3805, Idaho Code, where applicable, and that at
least one (1) of the following is the case:
(1) The individual lots described in the plat will not be served by any
water system common to one (1) or more of the lots, but will be served by indi-
vidual wells.
(2) All of the lots in the plat will be eligible to receive water service
from an existing water system, be the water system municipal, a water dis-
trict, a public utility subject to the regulation of the Idaho public utili-
ties commission, or a mutual or nonprofit water company, and the existing wa-
ter distribution system has agreed in writing to serve all of the lots in the
subdivision.
(3) If a new water system will come into being to serve the subdivision,
that it has or will have sufficient contributed capital to allow the water
system's wells, springboxes, reservoirs, and mains to be constructed to pro-
vide service without further connection charges or fees to the landowners
of the lots, except for connection of laterals, meters or other plant exclu-
sively for the lot owner's own use.
Failure to comply with this section is a misdemeanor subject to the pro-
visions of section 50-1329, Idaho Code. The certification must be filed or
recorded as part of the plat document preserved for public inspection. Prop-
erty owners in the area encompassed by the plat will be entitled to the bene-
fits of the third provision of this section when that option is chosen.
SECTION 10. That Section 67-6508, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6508. PLANNING DUTIES. It shall be the duty of the planning or plan-
ning and zoning commission to conduct a comprehensive planning process de-
signed to prepare, implement, and review, and update a comprehensive plan,
hereafter referred to as the plan. The plan shall include all land within the
jurisdiction of the governing board. The plan shall consider previous and
existing conditions, trends, compatibility of land uses, desirable goals
and objectives, or and desirable future situations for each planning compo-
nent. The plan with maps, charts, and reports shall be based on the following
components as they may apply to land use regulations and actions unless the
plan specifies reasons why a particular component is unneeded.


(a) Property Rights -- An analysis of provisions which may be necessary
to ensure that land use policies, restrictions, conditions and fees do not
violate private property rights, adversely impact property values or cre-
ate unnecessary technical limitations on the use of property and analysis as
prescribed under the declarations of purpose in chapter 80, title 67, Idaho
Code.
(b) Population -- A population analysis of past, present, and future
trends in population including such characteristics as total population,
age, sex, and income.
(c) School Facilities and Transportation -- An analysis of public
school capacity and transportation considerations associated with future
development.
(d) Economic Development -- An analysis of the economic base of the area
including employment, industries, economies, jobs, and income levels.
(e) Land Use -- An analysis of natural land types, existing land covers
and uses, and the intrinsic suitability of lands for uses such as agricul-
ture, forestry, mineral exploration and extraction, preservation, recre-
ation, housing, commerce, industry, and public facilities. A map shall be
prepared indicating suitable projected land uses for the jurisdiction.
(f) Natural Resources -- An analysis of the uses of rivers and other wa-
ters, forests, range, soils, harbors, fisheries, wildlife, minerals, ther-
mal waters, beaches, watersheds, and shorelines.
(g) Hazardous Areas -- An analysis of known hazards as may result from
susceptibility to surface ruptures from faulting, ground shaking, ground
failure, landslides or mudslides; avalanche hazards resulting from de-
velopment in the known or probable path of snowslides and avalanches, and
floodplain hazards.
(h) Public Services, Facilities, and Utilities -- An analysis showing
general plans for sewage, drainage, power plant sites, utility transmission
corridors, water supply, fire stations and fire fighting equipment, health
and welfare facilities, libraries, solid waste disposal sites, schools,
public safety facilities and related services. The plan may also show loca-
tions of civic centers and public buildings.
(i) Transportation -- An analysis, prepared in coordination with
the local jurisdiction(s) having authority over the public highways and
streets, showing the general locations and widths of a system of major traf-
fic thoroughfares and other traffic ways, and of streets and the recommended
treatment thereof. This component may also make recommendations on build-
ing line setbacks, control of access, street naming and numbering, and a
proposed system of public or other transit lines and related facilities
including rights-of-way, terminals, future corridors, viaducts and grade
separations. The component may also include port, harbor and other related
transportation facilities.
(j) Recreation -- An analysis showing a system of recreation areas, in-
cluding parks, parkways, trailways, river bank greenbelts, beaches, play-
grounds, and other recreation areas and programs.
(k) Special Areas or Sites -- An analysis of areas, sites, or struc-
tures of historical, archeological, architectural, ecological, wildlife,
or scenic significance.


(l) Housing -- An analysis of housing conditions and needs; plans for
improvement of housing standards; and plans for the provision of safe, san-
itary, and adequate housing, including the provision for low-cost conven-
tional housing, the siting of manufactured housing and mobile homes in sub-
divisions and parks and on individual lots which are sufficient to maintain
a competitive market for each of those housing types and to address the needs
of the community.
(m) Community Design -- An analysis of needs for governing landscaping,
building design, tree planting, signs, and suggested patterns and standards
for community design, development, and beautification.
(n) Agriculture -- An analysis of the agricultural base of the area in-
cluding agricultural lands, farming activities, farming-related businesses
and the role of agriculture and agricultural uses in the community.
(o) Implementation -- An analysis to determine actions, programs, bud-
gets, ordinances, or other methods including scheduling of public expendi-
tures to provide for the timely execution of the various components of the
plan.
(p) National Interest Electric Transmission Corridors -- After noti-
fication by the public utilities commission concerning the likelihood of
a federally designated national interest electric transmission corridor,
prepare an analysis showing the existing location and possible routing
of high voltage transmission lines, including national interest electric
transmission corridors based upon the United States department of energy's
most recent national electric transmission congestion study pursuant to
sections 368 and 1221 of the energy policy act of 2005. "High-voltage trans-
mission lines" means lines with a capacity of one hundred fifteen thousand
(115,000) volts or more supported by structures of forty (40) feet or more in
height.
(q) Public Airport Facilities -- An analysis prepared with assistance
from the Idaho transportation department division of aeronautics, if re-
quested by the planning and zoning commission, and the manager or person in
charge of the local public airport identifying, but not limited to, facility
locations, the scope and type of airport operations, existing and future
planned airport development and infrastructure needs, and the economic im-
pact to the community.
(r) When considering amending, repealing, or adopting a plan, the local
governing board shall consider the effect the proposed amendment, repeal,
or adoption of the plan would have on the source, quantity, and quality of
ground water in the area.
Nothing herein shall preclude the consideration of additional planning
components or subject matter.
SECTION 11. That Section 67-6537, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6537. USE OF SURFACE AND GROUND WATER. (1) The intent of this sec-
tion is to encourage the use of surface water for irrigation. All appli-
cants proposing to make land use changes shall be required to use surface wa-
ter, where reasonably available, as the primary water source for irrigation.
Surface water shall be deemed reasonably available if:


(a) A surface water right is, or reasonably can be made, appurtenant to
the land;
(b) The land is entitled to distribution of surface water from an irri-
gation district, canal company, ditch users association, or other irri-
gation delivery entity, and the entity's distribution system is capable
of delivering the water to the land; or
(c) An irrigation district, canal company, or other irrigation deliv-
ery entity has sufficient available surface water rights to apportion
or allocate to the land and has a distribution system capable of deliv-
ering the water to the land.
(2) Consistent with sections 42-108 and 42-222, Idaho Code, any change
in the nature of use of surface water provided by an irrigation delivery
entity must be authorized by the entity holding the water right(s) for the
available surface water. Nothing in this section shall alter the authority
and discretion of irrigation delivery entities to apportion, allocate and
distribute surface water, or for municipalities, counties, or water and
sewer districts to pass ordinances or regulations to promote the use of sur-
face water for irrigation.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to override or amend any
provision of title 42 or 43, Idaho Code, or impair any rights acquired there-
under.
(4) When considering amending, repealing or adopting a comprehensive
plan, the local governing board shall consider the effect the proposed
amendment, repeal or adoption of the comprehensive plan would have on the
source, quantity and quality of ground water in the area.
SECTION 12. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.